Utah statutes.
4-22-1.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Commission" means the Utah Dairy Commission.

(2)  "Dealer" means any person who buys and processes raw milk or milk fat, or who acts as agent in the sale or purchase of raw milk or milk fat, or who acts as a broker or factor with respect to raw milk or milk fat or any product derived from either.

(3)  "Producer" means a person who produces milk or milk fat from cows and who sells it for human or animal consumption, or for medicinal or industrial uses.

(4)  "Producer-handler" means any producer who processes raw milk or milk fat.

